Maine, session 132, LD665.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4651, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Military protective order. "Military protective order" means a protection order
issued pursuant to 10 United States Code, Section 1567 by a commanding officer of the
Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard of any state, against a person
under the officer's command.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §4654, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2011, c. 559, Pt. C, §§4 and 5,
is further amended by enacting at the end a new first blocked paragraph to read:
In making the determination required under paragraph A, the court may consider the
existence of an active military protective order.
Sec. 3. 19-A MRSA §4102, sub-§7-A is enacted to read:
7-A. Military protective order. "Military protective order" has the same meaning as
in Title 5, section 4651, subsection 3-A.
Sec. 4. 19-A MRSA §4102, sub-§8, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 647, Pt. A, §3
and affected by Pt. B, §65, is amended to read:
C. An order of a tribal court of the Passamaquoddy Tribe or the Penobscot Nation; or
Sec. 5. 19-A MRSA §4102, sub-§8, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 647, Pt. A, §3
and affected by Pt. B, §65, is amended to read:
D. A similar order issued by a court of the United States or of another state, territory,
commonwealth or federally recognized Indian tribe.; or
Sec. 6. 19-A MRSA §4102, sub-§8, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. A military protective order.
Sec. 7. 19-A MRSA §4108, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 647, Pt. A, §3 and
affected by Pt. B, §65, is amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0872(03)

1. Temporary orders. The court may enter temporary orders authorized under
subsection 2 that it considers necessary to protect a plaintiff or minor child from abuse, on
good cause shown in an ex parte proceeding, which the court shall hear and determine as
expeditiously as practicable after the filing of a complaint. Immediate and present danger
of abuse to the plaintiff or minor child constitutes good cause. In determining whether
good cause exists, the court may consider the existence of an active military protective
order. A temporary order remains in effect pending a hearing pursuant to section 4109.
Page 2 - 132LR0872(03)